Utah statutes.
53A-1a-508.   Content of a charter -- Modification of charter.
(1)  The major issues involving the operation of a charter school shall be
considered in advance by the applicant for a charter school and written into
the school's charter.
(2)  The governing body of the charter school and the chartering entity shall
sign the charter.
(3)  The charter shall include:
(a)  the age or grade levels to be served by the school;
(b)  the projected maximum number of students to be enrolled in the school and
the projected enrollment in each of the first three years of operations;
(c)  the governance structure of the school;
(d)  the financial plan for the school and the provisions which will be made
for auditing the school under Subsection 53A-1a-507(4);
(e)  the mission and education goals of the school, the curriculum offered,
and the methods of assessing whether students are meeting educational goals,
to include at a minimum participation in the Utah Performance Assessment
System for Students under Chapter 1, Part 6, Achievement Tests;
(f)  admission and dismissal procedures, including suspension procedures;
(g)  procedures to review complaints of parents regarding the operation of the
school;
(h)  the opportunity for parental involvement at the school;
(i)  how the school will provide adequate liability and other appropriate
insurance for the school, its governing body, and its employees;
(j)  the proposed school calendar, including the length of the school day and
school year;
(k)  whether any agreements have been entered into or plans developed with
school districts regarding participation of charter school students in
extracurricular activities within the school districts;
(l)  the district within which the school will be located and the address of
the school's physical facility, if known at the time the charter is signed;
(m)  the qualifications to be required of the teachers, including the
requirement of a criminal background check;
(n)  in the case of an existing public school converting to charter status,
alternative arrangements for current students who choose not to attend the
charter school and for current teachers who choose not to teach at the school
after its conversion to charter status;
(o)  the school's intention to create a library;
(p)  a description of school administrative and supervisory services;
(q)  fiscal procedures to be used by the school; and
(r)  the school's policies and procedures regarding:
(i)  employee evaluation; and
(ii)  employment of relatives.
(4)  A charter may be modified by mutual agreement of the board and the
governing body of the school.
(5)  In accordance with Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah Administrative Rulemaking
Act, the State Board of Education shall make rules that establish the
procedures and deadlines for approved charter schools to apply and qualify for
expansion, including the establishment of satellite campuses.
